Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1627
Authorization to operate; agent's permit; application; denial; extension of time; when.

The commissioner may grant to an applicant for an authorization to operate or an agent's permit an extension of time of reasonable duration in which the applicant may eliminate the reasons for denial contained in the statement of denial if the applicant has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the commissioner the desire to meet the standards established pursuant to sections 85-1606 and 85-1608 and if, in the judgment of the commissioner, it would be reasonably possible for the applicant to meet such requirements and standards within such time.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 27;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 27;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2827;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 27.